Utah statutes.
20A-9-206.   Fair campaign practices -- Voluntary pledge -- Pledge is a public record -- Retention requirements.

(1)  Each person seeking to become a candidate for any elective office that is to be filled at the next election shall be provided with a copy of the pledge of fair campaign practices.

(2)  The pledge shall be in the following form:

"PLEDGE OF FAIR CAMPAIGN PRACTICES

There are basic principles of decency, honesty, and fair play which every candidate for public office in the State of Utah has a moral obligation to observe and uphold, in order that, after vigorously contested but fairly conducted campaigns, our citizens may exercise their right to a free election, and that the will of the people may be fully and clearly expressed on the issues.

THEREFORE:

I SHALL conduct my campaign openly and publicly, discussing the issues as I see them, presenting my record and policies with sincerity and frankness, and criticizing, without fear or favor, the record and policies of my opponents that I believe merit criticism.

I SHALL NOT use, nor shall I permit the use of, scurrilous attacks on any candidate or the candidate's immediate family.  I shall not participate in, nor shall I permit the use of, defamation, libel, or slander against any candidate or the candidate's immediate family.  I shall not participate in, nor shall I permit the use of, any other criticism of any candidate or the candidate's immediate family that I do not believe to be truthful, provable, and relevant to my campaign.

I SHALL NOT use, nor shall I permit the use of, any practice that tends to corrupt or undermine our American system of free elections, or that hinders or prevents the free expression of the will of the voters, including practices intended to hinder or prevent any eligible person from registering to vote or voting.

I SHALL NOT coerce election help or campaign contributions for myself or for any other candidate from my employees or volunteers.

I SHALL immediately and publicly repudiate support deriving from any individual or group which resorts, on behalf of my candidacy or in opposition to that of an opponent, to methods in violation of the letter or spirit of this pledge.  I shall accept responsibility to take firm action against any subordinate who violates any provision of this pledge or the laws governing elections.

I SHALL defend and uphold the right of every qualified American voter to full and equal participation in the electoral process.

I, the undersigned, candidate for election to public office in the State of Utah, hereby voluntarily endorse, subscribe to, and solemnly pledge myself to conduct my campaign in accordance with the above principles and practices."

Name: ________________________________

Signature: _____________________________ Date: _________

(3)  The filing officer shall print, or cause to be printed, blank forms of the pledge to be distributed to persons filing a declaration of candidacy.

(4)  A pledge that is submitted for filing by a candidate is a public record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

(5)  The filing officer shall:

(a)  accept all signed pledges that are submitted for filing; and

(b)  retain each filed pledge for public inspection for 30 calendar days after the election.

(6)  A candidate may not be required to subscribe to, endorse, or sign the pledge of fair campaign practices.



Amended by Chapter 202, 2009 General Session

